src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection for Mansi
! ---------------

!! Stems ending in C



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V11_odd
!
+V+Inf:%>уӈкве K ;
 V11_MUTUAL ;

LEXICON V11_MUTUAL
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:%>%{ЭЕLong%}гум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}гын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:%>%{ЫИ%} K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1:%>%{ЫИ%}ме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu2:%>%{ЭЕ%}гы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu3:%>%{ЭЕLong%}г K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:%>%{ЭЕLong%}в K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:%>%{ЭЕ%}гы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:%>%{ЭЕLong%}гыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>%{ЫИ%}лум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>%{ЫИ%}лын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>%{ЫИ%}тэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>%{ЫИ%}ламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>%{ЫИ%}лы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>%{ЫИ%}тэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>%{ЫИ%}лув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>%{ЫИ%}лы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>%{ЫИ%}я̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>%{ЫИ%}ягум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>%{ЫИ%}ягын K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>%{ЫИ%}яге K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>%{ЫИ%}ягме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>%{ЫИ%}ягы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>%{ЫИ%}яге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>%{ЫИ%}ягув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>%{ЫИ%}ягы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>%{ЫИ%}яга̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>%{ЫИ%}янум K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>%{ЫИ%}ян K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>%{ЫИ%}янэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>%{ЫИ%}янме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>%{ЫИ%}яны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>%{ЫИ%}янэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>%{ЫИ%}янув K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>%{ЫИ%}яны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>%{ЫИ%}я̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>%{ЫИ%}яна̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>сум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>сын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ыс K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>ысаме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>сы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>сы̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>сӯв K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>сы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>сыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>ыслум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>ыслын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>ыстэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>ысламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>ыслы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>ыстэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>ыслув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>ыслы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>са̄ныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>сагум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>сагын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>саге K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>сагме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>сагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>саге̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>сагув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>сагы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>са̄ныл K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>саганыл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>санум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>сан K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>санэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>санме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>саны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>санэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>санув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>саны̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>саныл K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:%>асум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:%>асын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:%>ас K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu1:%>асаме̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu2:%>асы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScDu3:%>асы̄г K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:%>асӯв K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:%>асы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:%>асыт K ;

+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>аслум K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>аслын K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>астэ K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>асламе̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>аслы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>астэ̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>аслув K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>аслы̄н K ;
+V+Ind+Prt+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>аса̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:%>нӯвум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:%>нӯвын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:%>нув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu1:%>нуваме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu2:%>нувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScDu3:%>нувы̄г K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:%>нувӯв K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:%>нувы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:%>нӯвыт K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg1:%>нӯвлум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>нӯвлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScSg3:%>нӯвтэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu1:%>нувламе̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>нувлы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScDu3:%>нувтэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl1:%>нувлув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>нувлын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcSg3+ScPl3:%>нува̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg1:%>нува̄гум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>нува̄гын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScSg3:%>нува̄ге K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu1:%>нувагме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>нувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScDu3:%>нуваге̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl1:%>нувагув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>нувагы̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcDu3+ScPl3:%>нувага̄ныл K ;

+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg1:%>нува̄нум K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>нува̄нын K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScSg3:%>нува̄нэ K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu1:%>нуванме̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>нуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScDu3:%>нуванэ̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl1:%>нуванув K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>нуваны̄н K ;
+V+Cond+Prs+OcPl3+ScPl3:%>нува̄ныл K ;

+V+Imp+ScSg2:%>%{ЭЕ%}н K ;
+V+Imp+ScDu2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}н K ;
+V+Imp+ScPl2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}н K ;

+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScSg2:%>%{ЭЕ%}лн K ;
+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScDu2:%>%{ЭЕ%}лн K ;
+V+Imp+OcSg3+ScPl2:%>%{ЭЕ%}лн K ;

+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScSg2:%>%{ЭЕ%}гын K ;
+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScDu2:%>%{ЭЕ%}гын K ;
+V+Imp+OcDu3+ScPl2:%>%{ЭЕ%}гын K ;

+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScSg2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}н K ;
+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScDu2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}н K ;
+V+Imp+OcPl3+ScPl2:%>%{ЭЕLong%}н K ;

+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg1:%>вем K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg2:%>вен K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg3:%>ве K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1:%>вемена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1:%>веме̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2:%>вена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2:%>ве̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3:%>вега K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3:%>ве̄г K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1:%>вева K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1:%>ве̄в K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2:%>вена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2:%>ве̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl3:%>вет K ;

+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg1:%>ве̄сум K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg2:%>весын K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg3:%>вес K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu1:%>весме̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu2:%>весы̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu3:%>весы̄г K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl1:%>весӯв K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl2:%>весы̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl3:%>ве̄сыт K ;

+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg1:%>авем K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg2:%>авен K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScSg3:%>аве K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1:%>авемена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu1:%>авеме̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2:%>авена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu2:%>аве̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3:%>авега K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScDu3:%>аве̄г K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1:%>авева K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl1:%>аве̄в K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2:%>авена K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl2:%>аве̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prs+ScPl3:%>авет K ;

+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg1:%>аве̄сум K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg2:%>авесын K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScSg3:%>авес K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu1:%>авесме̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu2:%>авесы̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScDu3:%>авесы̄г K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl1:%>авесӯв K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl2:%>авесы̄н K ;
+V+Pass+Prt+ScPl3:%>аве̄сыт K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
